Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.417

Joint center for aerospace technology innovation—Termination.

The joint center for aerospace technology innovation shall be terminated July 1, 2030, as provided in RCW 43.131.418.

[ 2020 c 306 s 1; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 24 s 2; 2012 c 242 s 3.]